Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2356.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 9122(b)(1) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 9122. Expungement.* * *(b) Generally.--Criminal history record information may be expunged when:(1) An individual who is the subject of the information reaches [70] 65 years of age and has been free of arrest or prosecution for ten years following final release from confinement or supervision.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.1234567891011121314151617